Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9020 of Title 62, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Except as provided by subsection B of this section, no state

governmental entity or public trust having the state as its

beneficiary may enter into any agreement with a person, partnership,

limited partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation,

limited liability company, trust, or other legal entity that would

prohibit the state governmental entity or public trust from making

disclosure of the terms of any agreement with such entity to make

payment to or confer value upon the entity using an incentive, tax

credit, direct or indirect payment, grant, or similar benefit


Req. No. 2397 Page 1

offe red to the entity if the benefit is provided through the use of

state taxes.

B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not

require a state governmental entity or a public trust having the

state as its beneficiary to disclose information of a proprietary

nature with respect to a for-profit business entity if the

information has been provided to the state governmental entity or

public trust by or on behalf of the for-profit business entity, such

as trade secrets, the cost of inputs used or consumed by the

business entity, the labor costs of the for-profit business entity,

or information related to profit margins on goods or services sold

by the for-profit business entity.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-2397 QD 12/4/2025 2:27:01 PM



















Req. No. 2397 Page 2